Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 5

Appeals from General Sessions Court and Municipal Officers

27-5-101. Right of appeal.

Any person dissatisfied with the judgment of a recorder or other officer of a municipality charged with the conduct of trials, in a civil action, may, within ten (10) entire days thereafter, Sundays exclusive, appeal to the next term of circuit court.

Code 1858, § 3140 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 10); Acts 1869-1870, ch. 85; Shan., § 4871; mod. Code 1932, § 9019; Acts 1969, ch. 281, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-501.

Cross-References. Appeals in school attendance law cases, §49-6-3010.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction § 25; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 41.

Law Reviews.

Proceedings Before a Justice of the Peace (Richard N. Ivins), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 180.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal court clerk's obligation to transmit appeal bond to the circuit-court clerk. OAG 15-07, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/27/15).

27-5-102. Appeal from recorder or municipal officer.

Any party dissatisfied with the judgment of a recorder or officer of a municipal corporation charged with the trial of causes may appeal to the next circuit or special court, in all cases in which an appeal is allowed from the judgment of a judge of the court of general sessions, and subject to the same terms and restrictions.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 85; Shan., § 4878; mod. Code 1932, § 9027; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 20, 206.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

27-5-103. Appeal bond — Oath.

Before the appeal is granted, the person appealing shall give bond with good security, as hereinafter provided, for the costs of the appeal, or take the oath for poor persons.

An appeal bond filed by a plaintiff or defendant pursuant to this chapter shall be considered sufficient if it secures the cost of the cause on appeal.

Code 1858, § 3141 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 54); Shan., § 4872; Code 1932, § 9020; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-503; Acts 1988, ch. 647, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.13.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 62; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 41.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Release on bond of misdemeanant on de novo appeal, OAG 87-161, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (10/5/87).

Duty to set bond on misdemeanant's appeal of probation revocation or denial, OAG 98-0142, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 142 (8/7/98), OAG 98-0170, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170 (8/28/98).

Right to bond of misdemeanant appealing probation revocation, OAG 99-080, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (4/5/99).

General sessions criminal court questions; disorderly conduct, OAG 99-201, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 197 (10/6/99).

Requirement of surety bond to perfect appeal from general session court to circuit court; determination of party’s indigence. OAG 12-23, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (2/23/12).

Bonds with security posted for appeals from general sessions court. OAG 15-05, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/16/15).

27-5-104. Security for costs.

The original plaintiff may be ruled to security in the appellate court for the costs of the cause.

Code 1858, § 3146 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 131, § 2); Shan., § 4877; Code 1932, § 9026; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-504.

27-5-105. Filing of papers in circuit court.

When an appeal shall be perfected from the judgment of any judge of the court of general sessions, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the general sessions court to file the papers in the case in the office of the clerk of the circuit court, at least five (5) days before the meeting of the circuit court.

If an appeal is perfected within five (5) days before the meeting of the circuit court, the papers in the case shall be filed in the clerk's office by or on the first day of the term.

Any general sessions court clerk failing to comply with this section shall have no fees or costs allowed in such case.

Acts 1889, ch. 251, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 4873; mod. Code 1932, § 9021; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-505; modified.

Cross-References. Clerk of court of general sessions, title 18, ch. 4, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.13.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 50, 58, 63, 67; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 41.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal court clerk's obligation to transmit appeal bond to the circuit-court clerk. OAG 15-07, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/27/15).

27-5-106. Judgment on default of appellant.

If the clerk fails to return the papers within the time prescribed, but returns them during the term to which the same are returnable, and the appellant fails to appear and prosecute the appeal, if such appellant is the original defendant, the plaintiff shall have judgment final, by default, for the amount of the judgment of the court of general sessions, against the appellant for the debt and the appellant and the appellant's sureties for the cost.

If the plaintiff is the appellant, and fails to appear within the term, the plaintiff's suit shall be dismissed, and judgment given against the plaintiff and the plaintiff's sureties for costs.

Code 1858, § 3144 (deriv. Acts 1811, ch. 119, § 2); Shan., § 4875; Code 1932, § 9024; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-507; modified; Acts 1988, ch. 647, § 3.

27-5-107. Affirmance.

If the papers are properly returned, and the appellant fails to appear or defend as above, or if the appeal is dismissed for any cause, the appellee is entitled to an affirmance of the judgment below, with costs.

Code 1858, § 3145; Shan., § 4876; mod. Code 1932, § 9025; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-508.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 114, 246; 9 Tenn. Juris., Discontinuance and Nonsuit, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Appeal and Nonsuit — Inconclusive Dismissal, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 511.

27-5-108. Appeal from general sessions court.

Any party may appeal from a decision of the general sessions court to the circuit court of the county within a period of ten (10) days on complying with this chapter.

In civil cases, if one (1) or more of the parties before the general sessions court, on one (1) or more warrants, perfects an appeal of a decision of the general sessions court to the circuit court, as provided in this section, then cross appeals and separate appeals are not required, and upon the filing of a notice of appeal by any party, issues may be brought up for review by any party.

This provision allowing ten (10) days in which to perfect an appeal shall apply in every county of Tennessee, any provision of any private act to the contrary notwithstanding, it being the legislative intent to establish a uniform period of ten (10) days in which any such appeal may be perfected in any county in Tennessee.

Any appeal shall be heard de novo in the circuit court.

If no appeal is taken within the time provided, then execution may issue.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 4; T.C.A., § 27-509; modified; Acts 2002, ch. 707, § 1; 2008, ch. 756, § 1; 2018, ch. 858, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 858, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to appeals filed on or after May 3, 2018.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (a)(2) which read: “(2) If there are multiple parties in a case before the general sessions court in which comparative fault is an issue at trial, and if one (1) or more of the parties, but not all, perfects an appeal of a decision of the sessions court to the circuit court, as provided in this section, then the appealing party shall serve written notice to all other parties that an appeal has been taken. Such written notice shall be sent to the last known address of each such party or to the party's legal counsel. The other parties shall have ten (10) days from receipt of such notice to perfect an appeal.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 858 § 2. May 3, 2018.

Cross-References. Actions to recover personal property, §§16-15-502,29-30-217.

Forcible entry and detainer actions, §29-18-128.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.13.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Actions, § 2; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 16, 20, 206; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 176; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari § 16; 13 Tenn. Juris., Forcible Entry and Detainer § 17; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 25; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 41, 43; 26 Tenn. Juris., Words and Phrases, § 84.1A.

Law Reviews.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, VII. Appellate Review of the Disposition (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 366.

Tennessee Civil Procedure — Notice of Appeal from General Sessions to Circuit Court, 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 369.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

Tennessee Procedure — The Simple Appeal, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 642.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Attorney General Opinions. Appeals from grant or denial of order of protection, OAG 98-043, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (2/17/98).

All appeals of convictions in general sessions courts are reviewed de novo in circuit courts, OAG 01-079, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (9/14/01).

A defendant who pleads guilty to a small offense in sessions court has no right to appeal, but a defendant who pleads guilty to a misdemeanor offense greater than a small offense in general sessions court may seek de novo review of only the sentence imposed in circuit court, OAG 01-079, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (9/14/01).

An appeal of a general sessions court's revocation of probation to circuit court will be reviewed de novo, OAG 01-079, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (9/14/01).